Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1317
Director; adjust terms and conditions of employment; employees not covered by collective-bargaining agreements.

Except as may be prohibited by the Industrial Relations Act or the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act and except for the pay increases provided by the Legislature, the Director of Personnel shall have authority to establish programs and otherwise adjust terms and conditions of employment for employees not covered by collective-bargaining agreements, including terms and conditions of employment which may not be specifically provided or may otherwise be provided by law, in order to make such terms and conditions of employment more consistent with those of such covered employees or otherwise address changes arising out of collective bargaining, but in no event shall the adjustment exceed the benefits derived from collective bargaining.

Laws 1988, LB 1040, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 309, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1125, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 502, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 697, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 395, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 113, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 96, § 3.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.